Massachusetts, session 194th, H5287.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 94 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting, in line 16, after the words “acts of 1993” the following words: - , Compliance Officers
at the Department of Fire Services,
SECTION 2. Section 94B of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting, in line 9, after the words “fire controlman” the following words: - , Compliance Officer
at the Department of Fire Services, .
of 1